Hawaii statutes.
§171-77 Transfers of title by bequest,
devise, intestate succession, or by operation of law, and upon foreclosure.
Notwithstanding the prohibitions contained in section 171-73, title to a
residential lease or to the fee of the premises if purchased by the lessee, and
to the improvements upon the premises, may be transferred only by testamentary
bequest or devise, intestate succession, or otherwise by operation of law. No
person, corporation, or agency of government, disqualified under section 171-74
or 171-75 to take a residential lease, may succeed to and take title to a
residential lease and improvements, except by such transfer or by purchasing at
or after a sale upon a foreclosure of a mortgage permitted by this part.

If the lessee purchases the fee as provided in
section 171-79, no person, corporation, or agency of government, disqualified
under sections 171-74 and 171-75, may, without the express written consent of
the board of land and natural resources, within the ten-year period following
the issuance to the lessee of a patent or deed in fee simple to the premises,
succeed to and take the fee title to the premises formerly leased, and
improvements, except by testamentary bequest or devise, intestate succession,
or otherwise by operation of law, or by purchasing at or after a sale upon the
foreclosure of a mortgage permitted by this part. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; am L
1965, c 239, §7; Supp, §103A-73; HRS §171-77]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next